tests/possessives.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../crh.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../crh.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Cases and possessives (p1.sg)":
    bala<n><px1sg><nom> : balam
    bala<n><px1sg><acc> : balamnı
    bala<n><px1sg><gen> : balamnıñ
    bala<n><px1sg><dat> : balama
    bala<n><px1sg><loc> : balamda
    bala<n><px1sg><abl> : balamdan
    ev<n><px1sg><nom> : evim
    ev<n><px1sg><acc> : evimni
    ev<n><px1sg><gen> : evimniñ
    ev<n><px1sg><dat> : evime
    ev<n><px1sg><loc> : evimde
    ev<n><px1sg><abl> : evimden
    dost<n><px1sg><nom> : dostum
    dost<n><px1sg><acc> : dostumnı
    dost<n><px1sg><gen> : dostumnıñ
    dost<n><px1sg><dat> : dostuma
    dost<n><px1sg><loc> : dostumda
    dost<n><px1sg><abl> : dostumdan

  "Cases and possessives (p2.sg)":
    bala<n><px2sg><nom> : balañ
    bala<n><px2sg><acc> : balañnı
    bala<n><px2sg><gen> : balañnıñ
    bala<n><px2sg><dat> : balaña
    bala<n><px2sg><loc> : balañda
    bala<n><px2sg><abl> : balañdan
    ev<n><px2sg><nom> : eviñ
    ev<n><px2sg><acc> : eviñni
    ev<n><px2sg><gen> : eviñniñ
    ev<n><px2sg><dat> : eviñe
    ev<n><px2sg><loc> : eviñde
    ev<n><px2sg><abl> : eviñden
    dost<n><px2sg><nom> : dostuñ
    dost<n><px2sg><acc> : dostuñnı
    dost<n><px2sg><gen> : dostuñnıñ
    dost<n><px2sg><dat> : dostuña
    dost<n><px2sg><loc> : dostuñda
    dost<n><px2sg><abl> : dostuñdan

  "Cases and possessives (p3.sp)":
    bala<n><px3sp><nom> : balası
    bala<n><px3sp><acc> : balasını
    bala<n><px3sp><gen> : balasınıñ
    bala<n><px3sp><dat> : balasına
    bala<n><px3sp><loc> : balasında
    bala<n><px3sp><abl> : balasından
    ev<n><px3sp><nom> : evi
    ev<n><px3sp><acc> : evini
    ev<n><px3sp><gen> : eviniñ
    ev<n><px3sp><dat> : evine
    ev<n><px3sp><loc> : evinde
    ev<n><px3sp><abl> : evinden
    dost<n><px3sp><nom> : dostun
    dost<n><px3sp><acc> : dostunı
    dost<n><px3sp><gen> : dostunıñ
    dost<n><px3sp><dat> : dostuna
    dost<n><px3sp><loc> : dostunda
    dost<n><px3sp><abl> : dostundan

  #"Cases and possessives (p1.pl)":
    #bala<n><px1pl><nom> : balamız
    #bala<n><px1pl><acc> : balamıznı
    #bala<n><px1pl><gen> : balamıznıñ
    #bala<n><px1pl><dat> : balamızğa
    #bala<n><px1pl><loc> : balamızda
    #bala<n><px1pl><abl> : balamızdan
    #ev<n><px1pl><nom> : evimiz
    #ev<n><px1pl><acc> : evimizni
    #ev<n><px1pl><gen> : evimizniñ
    #ev<n><px1pl><dat> : evimizge
    #ev<n><px1pl><loc> : evimizde
    #ev<n><px1pl><abl> : evimizden
    #dost<n><px1pl><nom> : dostumız
    #dost<n><px1pl><acc> : dostumıznı
    #dost<n><px1pl><gen> : dostumıznıñ
    #dost<n><px1pl><dat> : dostumızğa
    #dost<n><px1pl><loc> : dostumızda
    #dost<n><px1pl><abl> : dostumızdan


  #"Cases and possessives (p2.pl)":
    #bala<n><px1pl><nom> : balañız
    #bala<n><px1pl><acc> : balañıznı
    #bala<n><px1pl><gen> : balañıznıñ
    #bala<n><px1pl><dat> : balañızğa
    #bala<n><px1pl><loc> : balañızda
    #bala<n><px1pl><abl> : balañızdan
    #ev<n><px1pl><nom> : eviñiz
    #ev<n><px1pl><acc> : eviñizni
    #ev<n><px1pl><gen> : eviñizniñ
    #ev<n><px1pl><dat> : eviñizge
    #ev<n><px1pl><loc> : eviñizde
    #ev<n><px1pl><abl> : eviñizden
    #dost<n><px1pl><nom> : dostuñız
    #dost<n><px1pl><acc> : dostuñıznı
    #dost<n><px1pl><gen> : dostuñıznıñ
    #dost<n><px1pl><dat> : dostuñızga
    #dost<n><px1pl><loc> : dostuñızda
    #dost<n><px1pl><abl> : dostuñızdan


  "Cases and posesssives with round vowel in 2nd σ":
    nutuq<n><px3sp><abl> : nutuğından
    qapu<n><px3sp><acc> : qapusını
    durum<n><px3sp><gen> : durumınıñ
    oğul<n><px2pl><ins> : oğluñıznen
    oğul<n><px2pl><dat> : oğluñızğa
    mülk<n><px2pl><acc> : mülküñizni
    üküm<n><acc> : ükümni
    ucüm<n><px3sp><acc> : ucümini
    ucüm<n><px3sp><gen> : ucüminiñ
    ümüt<n><px3sp><acc> : ümütini
    ölüm<n><px3sp><acc> : ölümini

  "two-syllable rounding stuffs":
    qomşu<n><px3sp><nom> : qomşusı
    qomşu<n><px3sp><dat> : qomşusına
    qomşu<n><gen> : qomşunıñ
    qomşu<n><px3sp><acc> : qomşusını
    qomşu<n><px1sg><gen> : qomşumnıñ
    qomşu<n><px3sp><gen> : qomşusınıñ
    qomşu<n><px3sp><abl> : qomşusından
    qomşu<n><px1pl><acc> : qomşumıznı
    qomşu<n><px1sg><nom> : qomşum
    qomşu<n><abl> : qomşudan
    yolcu<n><acc> : yolcunı
    yolcu<n><px3sp><nom> : yolcusı
    yolcu<n><gen> : yolcunıñ
    yolcu<n><px3sp><acc> : yolcusını
    yolcu<n><px1sg><nom> : yolcum
    yolcu<n><abl> : yolcudan
    yolcu<n><dat> : yolcuğa

  "one-syllable rounding stuff":
    yol<n><px3sp><acc> : yolunı
